Hawaii statutes.
PART
XVII. RECORDS AND REPORTS

A. Records

§414-470 Books and records. (a) Each
corporation shall keep accurate and complete books and records of account and
shall keep and maintain at its principal office, or other place as its board of
directors may order, minutes of the proceedings of its shareholders and board
of directors. The books and records of account shall include accounts of the
corporation's assets, liabilities, receipts, disbursements, gains, and losses.
The minutes of the proceedings of the shareholders and board of directors of
the corporation shall show, as to each meeting of the shareholders or the board
of directors, the time and place, if any, thereof, whether regular or special,
whether notice thereof was given, and if so in what manner, the names of those
present at directors' meetings, the number of shares present or represented at
shareholders' meetings, and the proceedings at each meeting. Any of the books
and records described in this subsection may be kept on, or by means of, or be
in the form of, any information storage device or method; provided that the
books and records can be converted into clearly legible paper form within a
reasonable time. Upon the request of any person entitled to inspect the books
and records pursuant to any provision of this chapter, a corporation, at its
own expense, shall convert the requested stored books and records. When books
and records are kept pursuant to this subsection, a clearly legible paper form
produced from or by means of the information storage device or method shall be
admissible as evidence, and accepted for all other purposes, to the same extent
as an original paper record of the same information would have been; provided
that the paper form accurately portrays the record.

(b) In every corporation incorporated under
this chapter, the board of directors of the corporation shall cause a book to
be kept for registering the names of all persons who are or shall become
shareholders of the corporation, showing the number of shares of stock held by
them respectively, and the time when they respectively became the owner of the
shares. The book shall be open at all reasonable times for the inspection of
the shareholders. The secretary or the person having the charge thereof shall
give a certified transcript of anything therein contained to any shareholder
applying therefor; provided that the shareholder pays a reasonable charge for
the preparation of the certified transcript. The transcript shall be legal
evidence of the facts therein set forth in any suit by or against the
corporation. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130, §35]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next